Arkansas, session 2025, HB1588.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-77-110 is amended to read as follows:
20-77-110. Increase in reimbursement rate or cost to state — Expansion
of coverage.
Notwithstanding any other provision in federal law or departmental
commitment which may exist to the contrary, the Department of Human Services
shall not:
(1)(A) Increase increase any reimbursement rate to any provider
or provider groups supported in whole or in part by funds administered by the
department, nor shall it without first seeking and receiving the approval of
*JMB424*
03-31-2025 12:26:42 JMB424

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 HB1588
the Governor and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(B) If reimbursement rates are decreased, the department
shall report to the Legislative Council concerning the reasons and
justification for the decrease in reimbursement rates;
(2) Adopt adopt any other rule or amendment to the Arkansas
Medicaid Program that would result in an obligation of the general revenues
of the state without first seeking and receiving the approval of the Governor
and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State; or
(3)(A) Apply for or implement any rule or amendment to the
Arkansas Medicaid Program or a Medicaid waiver from the Centers for Medicare
& Medicaid Services that would expand coverage to any additional individuals
or class of individuals and result in an obligation of the state without
first obtaining approval by a two-thirds (⅔) vote from either the Legislative
Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget
Committee.
(B) Subdivision (3)(A) of this section does not affect any
Medicaid state plan amendment or federal waiver in existence and implemented
as of the effective date of this section.

/s/McAlindon
















03-31-2025 12:26:42 JMB424